South Dakota, session 2026, SB212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-13:
There is created in the state treasury the homeowner tax reduction fund.
The Department of Revenue shall administer the fund. The purpose of the fund is
to provide a property tax rebate for owner-occupied single-family dwellings. Interest on
moneys credited to the fund must remain in the fund. Expenditures from the fund must
be budgeted through the general appropriation bill.
Moneys in the fund may not be transferred to the general fund.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.